Utah statutes.
53A-20b-301.   Charter School Reserve Account.

(1)  There is created within the Education Fund a restricted account known as the "Charter School Reserve Account."

(2)  The reserve account consists of:

(a)  money credited to the account pursuant to Section 53A-20b-202;

(b)  money appropriated to the account by the Legislature;

(c)  all income and interest derived from the deposit and investment of money in the account;

(d)  federal grants; and

(e)  private donations.

(3)  Money in the reserve account may be appropriated by the Legislature to:

(a)  restore amounts on deposit in a debt service reserve fund of a qualifying charter school to the debt service reserve fund requirement;

(b)  pay fees and expenses of the authority;

(c)  pay the principal of and interest on bonds issued for a qualifying charter school; or

(d)  otherwise provide financial assistance to a qualifying charter school.

